Rhode Island, session 2025, SB754.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28-9.2-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-9.2 entitled "Municipal
Police Arbitration" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-9.2-17. Continuance of contractual provisions.
All contractual provisions contained in a collective bargaining agreement entered into
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall continue in the following collective bargaining
agreement unless either the bargaining agent or the corporate authority shall, in writing, within the
thirty-day (30) period referred to in § 28-9.2-7, propose a change in any contractual provisions until
such time as a successor agreement has been reached between the parties or an interest arbitration
award has been rendered.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001745
========